nl: Type fornuisinstallatie: Ingebouwd; Drop-in; Vrijstaand; Inschuifmodel; Overig
sv: Typ av spisinstallation: Inbyggd; Drop-in; Fristående; Inskjutbar; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta instalacije štednjaka: Ugrađeni; Umetanje; Samostojeće; Uvlačenje; Ostalo
it: Tipo di montaggio della cucina: Integrato; Drop-in; Da posizionamento libero; Inserimento a scorrimento; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de instalação do fogão: Incorporado; De encaixe superior; Sem suporte; De encaixe deslizante; Outro
vi: Loại lắp đặt bếp nấu: Tích hợp; Âm bàn; Độc lập; Trượt vào; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de instalare a aragazului: Încorporat; Încorporare; De sine stătător; Glisare; Altele
es: Tipo de instalación de la gama: Incorporado; Volcado; Independiente; Deslizable; Otros
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve štedilnika: Vgradni; Drop; Prostostoječe; Vstavljanje; Druga
lt-LT: Viryklės montavimo tipas: Įmontuotas; Įleidžiamas; Laisvai pastatomas; Įstumiamas; Kita
ko: 레인지 설치 유형: 내장; 드롭인; 독립형; 슬라이드인; 기타
ja: レンジ設置タイプ: 内蔵; ドロップイン; 自立型; スライドイン; その他
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης κουζίνας: Ενσωματωμένο; Drop; Ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Σύρσιμο προς τα μέσα; Άλλο
hu: Tűzhely telepítési típusa: Beépített; Drop-in; Szabadon álló; Slide-in; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเตา: แบบในตัว; ติดตั้งแบบวางลงในช่อง; ตั้งพื้น; ติดตั้งแบบเลื่อนเข้า; อื่นๆ
de: Herdinstallationstyp: Eingebaut; Einbau; Freistehend; Einschub; Sonstiges
fr: Type d’installation de la cuisinière: Intégré; Encastrable; Sur pied; Glissable; Autre
fi: Lieden asennustyyppi: Sisäänrakennettu; Upotettava; Vapaasti seisova; Liu'utettava; Muu
nb: Type for rekkeviddeinstallasjon: Innebygd; Drop-in; Frittstående; Innskyvbar; Annet
en: Range installation type: Built-in; Drop-in; Free-standing; Slide-in; Other
ru: Тип установки плиты: Встраиваемая; Встраиваемый; Отдельно стоящая; Вставной; Другая
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на готварска печка: Вградено; Вграден; Свободностоящо; Плъзгащ се; Друго
cs: Typ instalace sporáku: Vestavěné; Drop-in; Volně stojící; Slide-in; Jiné
pl: Typ montażu pieca: Do zabudowy; Do zabudowy (drop-in); Wolnostojące; Wsuwana (slide-in); Inne
sk-SK: Typ inštalácie sporáka: Zabudované; Vložené; Voľne stojace; Zasúvacie; Iné
da: Komfurs installationstype: Indbygget; Drop-in; Fritstående; Slide-in; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do fogão: Incorporado; De encastrar; Sem suporte; De deslizar; Outro
tr: Ocak montaj tipi: Ankastre; Tezgâh üstü; Bağımsız; Sürgülü tip; Diğer
zh-CN: 灶台安装类型: 嵌入式; 下沉式; 独立式; 滑入式; 其他
zh-TW: 爐台安裝類型: 內建; 嵌入式; 獨立式; 滑入式; 其他